Hawaii statutes.
[§454M-8.3] Confidentiality. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in Public Law 110-289, section 1512, the
requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or
confidentiality of any information or material provided to NMLS, and any
privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any
federal or state court, with respect to the information or material shall
continue to apply to the information or material after the information or
material has been disclosed to NMLS. The information and material may be
shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage servicer
industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of
confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law.

(b) For these purposes, the commissioner is
authorized to enter into agreements or sharing arrangements with other
governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American
Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing
governmental agencies as established by rule or order of the commissioner.

(c) Information or material that is subject to
a privilege or confidentiality under subsection (a) shall not be subject to:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law
governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an
agency of the federal government or a state; or

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into
evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect
to any privilege held by NMLS applicable to the information or material;
provided that the person to whom the information or material pertains waives,
in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that privilege.

(d) Notwithstanding chapter 92F, the
examination process and related information and documents, including the
reports of examination, are confidential and are not subject to discovery or
disclosure in civil or criminal lawsuits.

(e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or
material described in subsection (a) that is inconsistent with subsection (a)
shall be superseded by the requirements of this section.

(f) This section shall not apply to
information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly
adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage servicers
that are included in NMLS for access by the
public. [L 2016, c 122, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next